Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0529.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 483b. An individual employed to circulate a petition described in section 482 must not be paid a fixed rate or amount for each petition signature collected or for each completed petition signature sheet. Sec. 544g. An individual employed to circulate a nominating petition must not be paid a fixed rate or amount for each nominating petition signature collected or for each completed nominating petition signature sheet. Sec. 590i. An individual employed to circulate a qualifying petition must not be paid a fixed rate or amount for each qualifying petition signature collected or for each completed qualifying petition signature sheet. Sec. 957a. An individual employed to circulate a recall petition under this chapter must not be paid a fixed rate or amount for each recall petition signature collected or for each completed recall petition signature sheet.